Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
PURPOSE: This act seeks to restore all rights and privileges to adults aged 18 through
20. Our government asks for and demands much from adults. Federal law recognizes 18 years
of age as the age of maturation. Upon reaching the age of maturity, 18 year old citizens are
granted all rights of adulthood.
However, Massachusetts has declared that adulthood is in stages. This bill restores the
rights of adulthood upon all persons aged 18 and older.
1. Lower the age of handgun and semiautomatic firearm ownership to 18.
SECTION 1.a. Amendment to Firearm Licensing Laws
(a) Chapter 140 of the General Laws, Section 131, is hereby amended by striking the
words “21 years of age” wherever they appear and inserting in place thereof the words “18 years
of age.”
of 5

(b) Chapter 140, Section 129B, is amended to allow individuals 18 years of age and older
to apply for a Firearm Identification (FID) card without restriction and for a License to Carry
(LTC) under the same conditions as those 21 and older.
SECTION 1.b. Lawful Purchase and Possession
(a) Any law restricting the purchase of handguns by individuals aged 18 to 20 is hereby
repealed.
(b) Licensed firearm dealers may lawfully sell handguns to individuals aged 18 and older
who meet all other requirements under state and federal law.
SECTION 1.c. Constitutional Compliance
This act is enacted in response to the ruling by the United States Court of Appeals for the
Fifth Circuit, which determined that bans on firearm purchases by legal adults aged 18 to 20 are
unconstitutional under the Second Amendment.
2. Lower the age of drinking alcohol
SECTION 2.a. Amendment to General Laws
Chapter 138 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended as follows:
(a) Section 34 shall be revised to state:
“No person under 18 years of age shall purchase, attempt to purchase, possess, or
consume alcoholic beverages. No licensee or employee of a licensed establishment shall sell,
deliver, or furnish alcoholic beverages to a person under 18 years of age.”
of 5

(b) Any reference in the General Laws to the legal drinking age of 21 shall be amended to
reflect the new legal drinking age of 18.
SECTION 2.b. Implementation and Enforcement
(a) The Alcoholic Beverages Control Commission (ABCC) shall oversee immediate
implementation and compliance with this act.
(b) Any penalties or fines for violations of underage drinking laws shall be adjusted to
reflect the new legal drinking age.
(c) Law enforcement agencies shall update procedures to enforce the revised age
requirements immediately.
SECTION 2.c. Federal Funding Consideration
(a) The Governor and Attorney General shall petition the federal government for an
exemption from the National Minimum Drinking Age Act of 1984 (23 U.S.C. § 158) to retain
federal highway funding.
(b) If an exemption is not granted, the General Court may revisit this law to address
funding concerns.
3. Lower the age of smoking tobacco
SECTION 3.a. Amendment to General Laws
Chapter 270 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended as follows:
(a) Section 6 shall be revised to state:
of 5

“No person under 18 years of age shall purchase, attempt to purchase, possess, or use
tobacco products. No person or establishment shall sell, deliver, or furnish tobacco products to a
person under 18 years of age.”
(b) Any reference in the General Laws to the legal age of 21 for the purchase of tobacco
products shall be amended to reflect the new legal age of 18.
SECTION 3.b. Implementation and Enforcement
(a) The Department of Public Health (DPH) shall oversee immediate implementation and
compliance with this act.
(b) Any penalties or fines for violations of tobacco-related laws shall be adjusted to
reflect the new legal age.
(c) Law enforcement agencies shall update procedures to enforce the revised age
requirements immediately.
SECTION 3.c. Federal Funding Consideration
(a) The Governor and Attorney General shall petition the federal government for an
exemption from the Family Smoking Prevention and Tobacco Control Act (21 U.S.C. § 301) to
retain federal tobacco-related funding.
(b) If an exemption is not granted, the General Court may revisit this law to address
funding concerns.
4. Lower the age of consuming/smoking marijuana
SECTION 4.a. Amendment to General Laws
of 5

Chapter 94G of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended as follows:
(a) Section 7 shall be revised to remove all instance of "21" and replaced with "18"
(b) Any reference in the General Laws to the legal personal use of marijuana age of 21
shall be amended to reflect the new legal consumption age of 18.
SECTION 4.b. Implementation and Enforcement
(a) The Alcoholic Beverages Control Commission (ABCC) shall oversee immediate
implementation and compliance with this act.
(b) Any penalties or fines for violations of underage drinking laws shall be adjusted to
reflect the new legal drinking age.
(c) Law enforcement agencies shall update procedures to enforce the revised age
requirements immediately.
SECTION 4.c. Federal Funding Consideration
(a) The Governor and Attorney General shall petition the federal government for an
exemption from the Family Smoking Prevention and Tobacco Control Act (21 U.S.C. § 301) to
retain federal marijuana-related funding.
(b) If an exemption is not granted, the General Court may revisit this law to address
funding concerns.
of 5